Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,135.01
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2017. Transfer of real estate.

A corporation may transfer any interest in real estate by instrument, with or without a corporate seal, signed by the president, a vice president, or the presiding officer of the board of directors of the corporation. Such instrument, when acknowledged by such officer to be an act of the corporation, shall be presumed to be valid and may be recorded in the proper office of the county in which the real estate is located, in the same manner as other such instruments.

Laws 2001, LB 138, § 1.